District of Columbia statutes.
1-15-34

(a)

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs for the operation and implementation of Chapter 3 of Title 1 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16 DCMR § 300 et seq.), with respect to the licensing and regulation of motor vehicle sales finance companies, are hereby transferred to the Department of Banking and Financial Institutions, established by § 26-551.03, effective June 9, 2001.

(b)

All of the functions assigned and authority delegated to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs concerning Chapter 3 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16 DCMR § 300 et seq.), with respect to the licensing and regulation of motor vehicle sales finance companies, are hereby transferred to the Department of Banking and Financial Institutions, established by § 26-551.03, effective June 9, 2001.